Washington statutes.
RCW 5.40.020

Written finding of presumed death as prima facie evidence.

A written finding of presumed death, made by the secretary of war, the secretary of the navy, or other officer or employee of the United States authorized to make such finding, pursuant to the federal missing persons act (56 Stat. 143, 1092, and P.L. 408, Ch. 371, 2d Sess. 78th Cong.; U.S.C. App. Supp. 1001-17), as now or hereafter amended, or a duly certified copy of such finding, shall be received in any court, office, or other place in this state as prima facie evidence of the death of the person therein found to be dead, and the date, circumstances, and place of his or her disappearance.

[ 2011 c 336 s 136; 1945 c 101 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 1257-1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1945 c 101: "If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance be held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable." [ 1945 c 101 s 4.] This applies to RCW 5.40.020 through 5.40.040.